California, session 20252026, AB1883.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Part 5.8 (commencing with Section 1580) is added to Division 2 of the Labor Code, to read:PART 5.8. Workplace Surveillance Tools1580. As used in this part:(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(a)(b) (1) “Employer” means a person or governmental entity that directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other person, employs or exercises control over the wages, benefits, other compensation, hours, working conditions, access to work or job opportunities, or other terms or conditions of employment, of any worker, including all branches of state government, and all cities, counties, cities and counties, charter cities, charter counties, special districts, including transit districts, the University of California, the California State University, community college districts, school districts, or any other state or local governmental entity.(2) “Employer” includes an employer’s labor contractor.(b)“Facial recognition technology” means any technology that analyzes a worker’s facial features to identify, verify, or track a worker in a still or video image.(c) “Neural data” means information that is generated by measuring the activity of a worker’s central or peripheral nervous system, and that is not inferred from nonneural information.(d) “Public prosecutor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 180.(e) “Worker” means a natural person, an employee of, or an independent contractor providing service to, or through, a business or a state or local governmental entity in a workplace.(f) “Workplace surveillance tool” means any system, application, instrument, or device that collects or facilitates the collection of worker data, activities, communications, actions, biometrics, or behaviors by means other than direct observation by a person, including, but not limited to, video or audio surveillance, continuous incremental time-tracking tools, geolocation, electromagnetic tracking, photoelectronic tracking, or that utilizes a photo-optical system or other means.1581. (a) (1)An employer shall not use a workplace surveillance tool on workers to do any of the following: that uses artificial intelligence on workers that is capable of either of the following:(A)Prevent compliance with or violate any federal, state, or local labor, occupational health and safety, employment, or civil rights laws or regulations.(B)Infer information about workers engaging in activity protected by state or federal law.(C)Make inferences about(1) Recognizing, or making inferences or predictions about, an individual’s emotional state.(D)Make inferences about an individual based on their gait.(E)Collect(2) Collecting neural data.(2)An employer shall not use facial recognition technology to make inferences about a worker for firing, deactivation, or disciplinary purposes.(3)An employer shall not use a workplace surveillance tool to infer a worker’s protected status under Section 12940 of the Government Code.(b) This section does not prohibit an employer from using a workplace surveillance tool to ensure safety, provided that the tool does not incorporate artificial intelligence that makes inferences or predictions based on a worker’s emotional, gait, neural data, protected status under Section 12940 of the Government Code, or about activity protected by state or federal law. or otherwise if it does not meet the specifications in subdivision (a).1582. (a) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this part, including investigating an alleged violation, and ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate a violation or maintain the status quo pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing through the procedures set forth in Section 98, 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, including issuing a citation against an employer who violates this part and filing a civil action. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 98.74 or 1197.1, as applicable.(b) This part may also be enforced by a public prosecutor pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 180) of Division 1.(c) Alternatively to subdivisions (a) and (b), a worker, or their exclusive representative, who has suffered a violation of this part may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for damages caused by the violation.(d) In any civil action brought pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c), the petitioner may seek appropriate temporary or preliminary injunctive relief, including punitive damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), in addition to any other remedy, an employer who violates this part may be subject to a penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.(2) An employee, the Labor Commissioner, or a public prosecutor may recover a penalty under this part as a statutory penalty paid to the employee or a civil penalty, but not both, for the same violation.(f) An action brought pursuant to this section may be brought in the superior court in any county in which the violation in question is alleged to have occurred or in which the employer resides.(g) This part does not preempt any city, county, or city and county ordinance that provides equal or greater protection to workers who are covered by this part.1583. (a) This part shall not apply to the use of a workplace artificial intelligence tool or a workplace surveillance tool to the extent that use of the tool is required by, or reasonably necessary to comply with, a federal statute, federal regulation, or binding federal contract does not prohibit the use of a tool relating to any of the following:(1) The development of aircraft for use in the national airspace.(2) The development of products or services for national security, military, space, or defense purposes.(b) The exemption in this section applies only to the operations covered by a federal statute, federal regulation, or binding federal contract outlined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a). the use of a tool that is reasonably necessary to comply with a federal statute, federal regulation, or binding federal contract.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act adding Part 5.8 (commencing with Section 1580) to Division 2 of the Labor Code addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act applies to all cities, including charter cities.